District of Columbia statutes.
22-1807

Punishment for offenses not covered by provisions of Code.

Whoever shall be convicted of any criminal offense not covered by the provisions of any section of this Code, or of any general law of the United States not locally inapplicable in the District of Columbia, shall be punished by a fine not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or by imprisonment for not more than 5 years, or both.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1337, ch. 854, § 910
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 201(aa), 60 DCR 2064

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-107.
1973 Ed., § 22-107.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not exceeding $1,000”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 201(aa) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.